Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6703
Tax credit for school district taxes paid.

(1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, there shall be allowed to each eligible taxpayer a refundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or against the franchise tax imposed by sections 77-3801 to 77-3807. The credit shall be equal to the credit percentage for the taxable year, as set by the department under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the amount of school district taxes paid by the eligible taxpayer during such taxable year.

(2)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin during calendar year 2022, the department shall set the credit percentage so that the total amount of credits for such taxable years shall be five hundred forty-eight million dollars; and

(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin during calendar year 2023, the department shall set the credit percentage so that the total amount of credits for such taxable years shall be five hundred sixty million seven hundred thousand dollars.

(3) If the school district taxes are paid by a corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code, a partnership, a limited liability company, a trust, or an estate, the amount of school district taxes paid during the taxable year may be allocated to the shareholders, partners, members, or beneficiaries in the same proportion that income is distributed for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The department shall provide forms and schedules necessary for verifying eligibility for the credit provided in this section and for allocating the school district taxes paid. For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the refundable credit shall be claimed by the corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code, the partnership, the limited liability company, the trust, or the estate that paid the school district taxes.

(4) For any fiscal year or short year taxpayer, the credit may be claimed in the first taxable year that begins following the calendar year for which the credit percentage was determined. The credit shall be taken for the school district taxes paid by the taxpayer during the immediately preceding calendar year.

(5) For the first taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, for a corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code, a partnership, a limited liability company, a trust, or an estate that paid school district taxes in calendar year 2020 but did not claim the credit directly or allocate such school district taxes to the shareholders, partners, members, or beneficiaries as permitted under subsection (3) of this section, there shall be allowed an additional refundable credit. This credit shall be equal to six percent, multiplied by the amount of school district taxes paid during 2020 by the eligible taxpayer.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 113;

Laws 2021, LB181, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB873, § 6;

Laws 2023, LB243, § 18;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB34, § 28.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.